Washington statutes.
RCW 43.72.011

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, "health carrier," "health care provider," "provider," "health plan," and "health care facility" have the same meaning as provided in RCW 48.43.005.

[ 1997 c 274 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1997 c 274: See note following RCW 41.05.021.